Virginia statutes. Title 61.1. Warehouses, Cold Storage and Refrigerated Locker Plants.
Chapter 6. Fees for Sale of Burley Tobacco.

§ 61.1-55.
Commission and basket charge.

No person, firm, association, corporation, partnership, copartnership or other legal entity, who or which operates any warehouse in which burley tobacco is sold at public auction, shall charge or receive any commission in excess of four percent of the sales price of such tobacco, nor shall any basket charge be in excess of twenty-five cents per basket, which commission and basket charge shall constitute the entire amount charged by the warehouse operator in connection with such sale; provided, however, that on or before the opening day of the market in any year, the warehouse operator may elect to charge a commission of not exceeding seventy-five cents per 100 pounds, which commission shall constitute the entire charge made in connection with the sale of tobacco throughout that market season at the warehouse for which such election is made.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-154; 1968, c. 69; 2000, c. 380.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 380 substituted “four percent” for “three percent.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Warehouses and Warehousemen, § 3.

§ 61.1-56.
Penalty for violation.

Any such operator of a warehouse violating the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-155; 1968, c. 69.